src/main/resources/bg_BG.aff
SFX U Y 184
SFX U   да        дат       .
SFX U   да        де        .
SFX U   да        дейки     .
SFX U   да        дели      .
SFX U   да        делите    .
SFX U   да        дем       .
SFX U   да        ден       .
SFX U   да        дена      .
SFX U   да        дената    .
SFX U   да        дени      .
SFX U   да        дените    .
SFX U   да        дения     .
SFX U   да        деният    .
SFX U   да        дено      .
SFX U   да        деното    .
SFX U   да        дете      .
SFX U   да        деш       .
SFX U   да        деше      .
SFX U   да        ди        .
SFX U   да        дох       .
SFX U   да        доха      .
SFX U   да        дохме     .
SFX U   да        дохте     .
SFX U   да        дял       .
SFX U   да        дяла      .
SFX U   да        дялата    .
SFX U   да        дялия     .
SFX U   да        дялият    .
SFX U   да        дяло      .
SFX U   да        дялото    .
SFX U   да        дях       .
SFX U   да        дяха      .
SFX U   да        дяхме     .
SFX U   да        дяхте     .
SFX U   да        дящ       .
SFX U   да        дяща      .
SFX U   да        дящата    .
SFX U   да        дящи      .
SFX U   да        дящите    .
SFX U   да        дящия     .
SFX U   да        дящият    .
SFX U   да        дящо      .
SFX U   да        дящото    .
SFX U   да        л         .
SFX U   да        ла        .
SFX U   да        лата      .
SFX U   да        ли        .
SFX U   да        лите      .
SFX U   да        лия       .
SFX U   да        лият      .
SFX U   да        ло        .
SFX U   да        лото      .
SFX U   та        л         .
SFX U   та        ла        .
SFX U   та        лата      .
SFX U   та        ли        .
SFX U   та        лите      .
SFX U   та        лия       .
SFX U   та        лият      .
SFX U   та        ло        .
SFX U   та        лото      .
SFX U   та        тат       .
SFX U   та        те        .
SFX U   та        тейки     .
SFX U   та        тели      .
SFX U   та        телите    .
SFX U   та        тем       .
SFX U   та        тен       .
SFX U   та        тена      .
SFX U   та        тената    .
SFX U   та        тени      .
SFX U   та        тените    .
SFX U   та        тения     .
SFX U   та        теният    .
SFX U   та        тено      .
SFX U   та        теното    .
SFX U   та        тете      .
SFX U   та        теш       .
SFX U   та        теше      .
SFX U   та        ти        .
SFX U   та        тох       .
SFX U   та        тоха      .
SFX U   та        тохме     .
SFX U   та        тохте     .
SFX U   та        тял       .
SFX U   та        тяла      .
SFX U   та        тялата    .
SFX U   та        тялия     .
SFX U   та        тялият    .
SFX U   та        тяло      .
SFX U   та        тялото    .
SFX U   та        тях       .
SFX U   та        тяха      .
SFX U   та        тяхме     .
SFX U   та        тяхте     .
SFX U   та        тящ       .
SFX U   та        тяща      .
SFX U   та        тящата    .
SFX U   та        тящи      .
SFX U   та        тящите    .
SFX U   та        тящия     .
SFX U   та        тящият    .
SFX U   та        тящо      .
SFX U   та        тящото    .
SFX U   я         0         .
SFX U   я         е         .
SFX U   я         ейки      .
SFX U   я         ел        .
SFX U   я         ела       .
SFX U   я         елата     .
SFX U   я         ели       .
SFX U   я         елите     .
SFX U   я         елия      .
SFX U   я         елият     .
SFX U   я         ело       .
SFX U   я         елото     .
SFX U   я         ем        .
SFX U   я         ете       .
SFX U   я         ех        .
SFX U   я         еха       .
SFX U   я         ехме      .
SFX U   я         ехте      .
SFX U   я         еш        .
SFX U   я         еше       .
SFX U   я         ещ        .
SFX U   я         еща       .
SFX U   я         ещата     .
SFX U   я         ещи       .
SFX U   я         ещите     .
SFX U   я         ещия      .
SFX U   я         ещият     .
SFX U   я         ещо       .
SFX U   я         ещото     .
SFX U   я         й         .
SFX U   я         йте       .
SFX U   я         л         .
SFX U   я         ла        .
SFX U   я         лата      .
SFX U   я         ли        .
SFX U   я         лите      .
SFX U   я         лия       .
SFX U   я         лият      .
SFX U   я         ло        .
SFX U   я         лото      .
SFX U   я         н         .
SFX U   я         на        .
SFX U   я         ната      .
SFX U   я         ни        .
SFX U   я         ните      .
SFX U   я         ния       .
SFX U   я         ният      .
SFX U   я         но        .
SFX U   я         ното      .
SFX U   я         х         .
SFX U   я         ха        .
SFX U   я         хме       .
SFX U   я         хте       .
SFX U   я         ят        .
SFX U   дя        дял       .
SFX U   дя        дяла      .
SFX U   дя        дялата    .
SFX U   дя        дяло      .
SFX U   дя        дялото    .
SFX U   дя        дян       .
SFX U   дя        дяна      .
SFX U   дя        дяната    .
SFX U   дя        дяния     .
SFX U   дя        дяният    .
SFX U   дя        дяно      .
SFX U   дя        дяното    .
SFX U   дя        дят       .
SFX U   дя        дях       .
SFX U   дя        дяха      .
SFX U   дя        дяхме     .
SFX U   дя        дяхте     .
SFX U   дя        ж         .
SFX U   дя        жте       .
SFX U   дя        дите      .
SFX U   дя        диш       .
SFX U   дя        дех       .
SFX U   дя        деха      .
SFX U   дя        дехме     .
SFX U   дя        дехте     .
SFX U   дя        деше      .
SFX U   дя        ди        .
