src/main/resources/bg_BG.dic
балтая/U
блуждая/U
бода/U
бозая/U
бракосъчетая/U
вдълбая/U
величая/U
венчая/U
вещая/U
видя/U
витая/U
вкопая/U
влияя/U
вмета/U
вплета/U
впреда/U
вчета/U
въведа/U
възведа/U
възмечтая/U
възпроизведа/U
възроптая/U
гадая/U
гуляя/U
дерзая/U
доведа/U
дойда/UV
докопая/U
домета/U
доплета/U
допреда/U
допрочета/U
доскучая/U
дочета/U
дълбая/U
желая/U
забода/U
заведа/U
завещая/U
задълбая/U
заиграя/U
закопая/U
закопчая/U
замета/U
замечтая/U
замотая/U
занимая/U
заплета/U
запреда/U
заридая/U
засияя/U
зачертая/U
зачета/U
зашляя/U
играя/U
ида/UV
избода/U
изведа/U
изгуляя/U
издълбая/U
изиграя/U
изкопая/U
измета/U
измотая/U
изнапреда/U
изплета/U
изпреда/U
изругая/U
изтерзая/U
изчертая/U
изчета/U
клада/KU
колебая/U
копая/U
крада/U
лаская/U
мета/U
мечтая/U
мотая/U
набода/U
набозая/U
наведа/U
надиграя/U
надойда/UV
надчета/U
наиграя/U
наклада/U
накопая/U
накрада/U
намета/U
намотая/U
напикая/U
наплета/U
напреда/U
наругая/U
наскучая/U
насмета/U
начертая/U
начета/U
нуждая/U
обещая/U
обзаведа/U
обиграя/U
обладая/U
обуздая/U
окопая/U
окрада/U
омета/U
омотая/U
онеправдая/U
оплета/U
оправдая/U
опреда/U
опровергая/U
оседлая/U
осияя/U
осъзная/U
отбода/U
отведа/U
отгадая/U
отида/UV
откопая/U
откопчая/U
отмета/U
отмотая/U
отплета/U
отчета/U
очертая/U
пикая/U
питая/U
плета/U
побода/U
поведа/U
повлияя/U
подбода/U
подведа/U
подиграя/U
подклада/U
подкопая/U
подмета/U
подоведа/U
подойда/UV
подплета/U
подчертая/U
пожелая/U
позаведа/U
поиграя/U
поизмета/U
поколебая/U
полаская/U
помета/U
помечтая/U
помотая/U
понамотая/U
понапреда/U
пообиграя/U
поомета/U
поотведа/U
поотида/UV
поотмета/U
попикая/U
попреда/U
поразведа/U
поразиграя/U
поразколебая/U
порицая/U
поругая/U
посведа/U
посмета/U
постарая/U
почета/U
преведа/U
преда/U
предвещая/U
предначертая/U
предпочета/U
преиграя/U
преклада/U
прекопая/U
премета/U
преплета/U
препреда/U
препрочета/U
престарая/U
прибода/U
приведа/U
придойда/UV
призная/U
приклада/U
прилаская/U
приплета/U
пробода/U
проведа/U
проиграя/U
произведа/U
прокопая/U
просияя/U
прочета/U
разведа/U
развенчая/U
разгадая/U
разиграя/U
разкатая/U
разклада/U
разколебая/U
разкопая/U
разкопчая/U
размета/U
размечтая/U
размотая/U
разотида/UV
разплета/U
разпреда/U
разридая/U
разседлая/U
разузная/U
разчертая/U
разчета/U
разюздая/U
ридая/U
роптая/U
ругая/U
самообладая/U
самооправдая/U
сведа/U
седлая/U
сияя/U
скатая/U
скучая/U
смета/U
смотая/U
сплета/U
старая/U
страдая/U
счета/U
съчетая/U
терзая/U
убода/U
увенчая/U
увещая/U
узная/U
чертая/U
чета/KU
шляя/U
